Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 13 Rhode Island Code of Military Justice

30-13-1.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (1) "Accuser" means a person who signs and swears to charges, any person who directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, and any person who has an interest, other than an official interest, in the prosecution of the accused; (2) "Active state duty" means full-time duty in the active military service of the state under an order of the governor issued under authority vested in the governor by law, and includes travel to and from that duty; (3) "Code" means this chapter; (4) "Commanding officer" includes only commissioned officers; (5) "Commissioned officer" includes a commissioned warrant officer; (6) "Convening authority" includes, in addition to the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, or a successor in command; (7) "Duty status other than active state duty" means any type of required duty other than that set forth in subdivision (2) of this section and includes travel to and from that duty; (8) "Enlisted member" means a person in an enlisted grade; (9) "Grade" means a step or degree, in a graduated scale of office or military rank, that is established and designed as a grade by law or regulation; (10) Law officer” means an official of a general court-martial detailed in accordance with § 30-13-28 (11) "Law specialist" means a commissioned officer of the organized naval militia of the state designated for special duty (law); (12) "Legal officer" means any commissioned officer of the organized naval militia of the state designated to perform legal duties for a command; (13) "May" is used in a permissive sense. The words "no person may " mean that no person is required, authorized, or permitted to do the act prescribed; (14) "Military" refers to any or all of the armed forces; (15) "Military court" means a court-martial, a court of inquiry, or a provost court; (16) "Officer" means commissioned or warrant officer; (17) "Rank" means the order of precedence among members of the state military forces; (18) "Shall" is used in an imperative sense; (19) "State judge advocate" means the commissioned officer on the staff of the adjutant general responsible for supervising military justice in the state military forces; (20) “State military forces” means the national guard of the state, as defined in , the organized naval militia of the state, the independent chartered military organizations, the Rhode Island state guard and the unorganized militia, and any other military force organized under the laws of the state; and 32 U.S.C. § 101(3) (21) "Superior commissioned officer" means a commissioned officer superior in rank or command.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 70, § 1.

30-13-2.
Persons subject to code.

This code applies to all members of the state military forces who are not in federal service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-3.
Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

Each person discharged from the state military forces who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained his or her discharge is, subject to §

30-13-46

, subject to trial by court-martial on that charge and is, after apprehension, subject to this code while in the custody of the military for that trial. Upon conviction of that charge, he or she is subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this code committed before the fraudulent discharge or after conviction.

No person who has deserted from the state military forces may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-4.
Court-martial of dismissed officer.

If any commissioned officer, dismissed by order of the governor, makes a written application for trial by court-martial, setting forth, under oath, that he or she has been wrongfully dismissed, the governor, as soon as practicable, shall convene a general court-martial to try that officer on charges on which the he or she was dismissed. A court-martial so convened has jurisdiction to try the dismissed officer on those charges, and the officer shall be considered to have waived the right to plead any statute of limitations applicable to any offense with which he or she is charged. The court-martial may, as part of its sentence, adjudge the affirmance of the dismissal, but if the court-martial acquits the accused or if the sentence adjudged, as finally approved or affirmed, does not include dismissal, the chief of staff to the governor shall substitute for the dismissal ordered by the governor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue.

If the governor fails to convene a general court-martial within six (6) months from the presentation of an application for trial under this code, the chief of staff to the governor shall substitute for the dismissal ordered by the governor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue.

If a discharge is substituted for a dismissal under this code, the governor alone may reappoint the officer to such a commissioned grade and with such rank as, in the opinion of the governor, that former officer would have attained had he or she not been dismissed. The reappointment of a former officer may be made only if a vacancy is available under applicable tables of organization. All time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes.

If an officer is discharged from the organized militia by administrative action or by board proceedings under law, or is dropped from the rolls by order of the governor, he or she has no right to trial under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-5.
Territorial applicability of code.

This code applies throughout the state. It also applies to all persons otherwise subject to this code while they are serving outside the state, and while they are going to, and returning from, service outside the state, in the same manner, and to the same extent, as if they were serving inside the state.

Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may be convened and held in units of the state military forces while those units are serving outside the state with the same jurisdiction and powers as to persons subject to this code as if the proceedings were held inside the state and offenses committed outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-5

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-6.
Judge advocates and legal officers.

The governor, on the recommendation of the adjutant general, shall appoint an officer of the state military forces as state judge advocate. To be eligible for appointment, an officer must be a member of the bar of the highest court of the state and must have been a member of the bar of the state for at least five (5) years.

The adjutant general may appoint as many assistant state judge advocates as he or she considers necessary. To be eligible for appointment, assistant state judge advocates must be officers of the state military forces and members of the bar of the highest court of the state.

The state judge advocate, or his or her assistants, shall make frequent inspections in the field in the supervision of the administration of military justice.

A person punished under this section who considers his or her punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority. The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided and the person to be punished shall not be required to undergo the punishment adjudged until affirmed or modified by the next superior authority. The officer who imposes the punishment, the officer’s successor in command, and the officer’s superior authority may suspend, set aside, or remit any part or amount of the punishment and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected.

No person who has acted as a member, law officer, trial counsel, assistant defense counsel, or investigating officer, or who has been a witness for either the prosecution or defense in any case, may later act as staff judge advocate or legal officer to any reviewing authority upon the same case.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-6

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-7.
Authority to apprehend.

“Apprehension” is the taking of a person into custody.

Any person authorized by this code, or by regulations issued under it, to apprehend persons subject to this code, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this code, and any peace officer authorized to do so by law, may apprehend persons subject to the code upon reasonable belief that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers, petty officers, and noncommissioned officers have authority to quell quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part therein.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-7

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-8.
Apprehension of deserters.

Any civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, territory, commonwealth, or possession, or the District of Columbia, may summarily apprehend a deserter from the state military forces and deliver him or her into the custody of the state military forces. If an offender is apprehended outside the state, his or her return to the area must be in accordance with normal extradition procedures or reciprocal agreement.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-8

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-9.
Imposition of restraint.

“Arrest” is the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing that person to remain within certain specified limits. “Confinement” is the physical restraint of a person.

An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through other persons subject to this code or through any person authorized by this code to apprehend persons. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers, petty officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of his or her command, or subject to his or her authority, into arrest or confinement.

A commissioned officer, or a warrant officer, may be ordered apprehended or into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority he or she is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order these persons apprehended, or into arrest or confinement, may not be delegated.

No person may be ordered apprehended or into arrest or confinement except for probable cause.

This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-10.
Restraint of persons charged with offenses.

Any person subject to this code, charged with an offense under this code, shall be ordered into arrest or confinement, as circumstances may require; but when charged only with an offense normally tried by a summary court-martial, that person shall not ordinarily be placed in confinement. When any person subject to this code is placed in arrest or confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform that person of the specific wrong of which he or she is accused and to try that person or to dismiss the charges and release him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-10

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-11.
Confinement in jails.

Persons confined other than in a guard house, whether before, during, or after trial by a military court, shall be confined in civil jails, penitentiaries, or prisons designated by the governor or by that person as he or she may authorize to act.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-12.
Reports and receiving of prisoners.

No provost marshal, commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under §

30-13-11

, may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his or her charge, when the committing person furnishes a statement, signed by that person, of the offense charged against the prisoner.

Every commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or of any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under §

30-13-11

, to whose charge a prisoner is committed, shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after that commitment or as soon as he or she is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against the prisoner, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-13.
Punishment prohibited before trial.

Subject to §

30-13-60

, no person, while being held for trial or pending the result of trial, may be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against that person, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon him or her be any more rigorous than the circumstances require to insure his or her presence, but he or she may be subjected to minor punishment during that period for infractions of discipline.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-13

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-14.
Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

Under such regulations as may be prescribed under this code, a person subject to this code who is accused of an offense against civil authority may be delivered, upon request, and upon direction of the governor so to do, to the civil authority for trial.

When delivery under this section is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, and the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, the offender, after having answered to the civil authorities for his or her offense, shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to military custody for the completion of his or her sentence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-15.
Nonjudicial punishment.

Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, and under such additional regulations as may be prescribed by the adjutant general, limitations may be placed on the powers granted by this chapter with respect to the kind and amount of punishment authorized; the categories of commanding officers and warrant officers exercising command authorized to exercise those powers; the applicability of this chapter to an accused who demands trial by court-martial; and the kinds of courts-martial to which the case may be referred upon that demand. However, punishment may not be imposed upon any member of the state military forces under this section if the member has, before the imposition of punishment, demanded trial by court-martial in lieu of punishment. Under similar regulations, rules may be prescribed with respect to the suspension of punishments authorized hereunder. If authorized by regulations of the adjutant general, a commanding officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction, or an officer of general rank in command, may delegate his or her powers under this chapter to a principal assistant.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, any commanding officer may, in addition to, or in lieu of, admonition or reprimand, impose one or more of the following disciplinary punishments for minor offenses without the intervention of court-martial:

Upon officers of his or her command:

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than thirty (30) consecutive days; and

If imposed by an officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction or an officer of general rank in command:

Arrest in quarters for not more than thirty (30) consecutive days;

Forfeiture of not more than one-half (1/2) of one month’s pay per month for two (2) months;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than sixty (60) consecutive days; and

Detention of not more than one-half (1/2) of one month’s pay per month for three (3) months; and

Upon other personnel of his or her command:

Correctional custody for not more than seven (7) consecutive days;

Forfeiture of not more than seven (7) days’ pay;

Reduction to the next inferior pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction;

Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than fourteen (14) consecutive days;

Restrictions to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen (14) consecutive days;

Detention of not more than fourteen (14) days’ pay; and

If imposed by an officer of the grade of major or above:

Correctional custody for not more than thirty (30) consecutive days;

Forfeiture of not more than one-half (1/2) of one month’s pay per month for two (2) months;

Reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction, or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction, but an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-4 may not be reduced more than two (2) pay grades;

Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than forty-five (45) consecutive days;

Restrictions to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than sixty (60) consecutive days; and

Detention of not more than one-half (1/2) of one month’s pay per month for three (3) months.

Detention of pay shall be for a stated period of not more than one year, but if the offender’s term of service expires earlier, the detention shall terminate upon that expiration. No two (2) or more of the punishments of arrest in quarters, correctional custody, extra duties, and restriction may be combined to run consecutively in the maximum amount imposable for each. Whenever any of those punishments are combined to run consecutively, there must be an apportionment. In addition, forfeiture of pay may not be combined with detention of pay without an apportionment. For the purposes of this subsection, “correctional custody” is the physical restraint of a person during duty or nonduty hours and may include extra duties, fatigue duties, or hard labor. If practicable, correctional custody will not be served in immediate association with persons awaiting trial or held in confinement pursuant to trial by court-martial.

An officer in charge may impose upon enlisted members assigned to the unit of which that officer is in charge such of the punishments authorized under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section as the adjutant general may specifically prescribe by regulation.

The officer who imposes the punishment authorized in subsection (b) of this section, or his or her successor in command, may, at any time, suspend probationally any part or amount of the unexecuted punishment imposed and may suspend probationally a reduction in grade or forfeiture imposed under subsection (b) of this section, whether or not executed. In addition, that officer may, at any time, remit or mitigate any part or amount of the unexecuted punishment imposed and may set aside in whole or in part the punishment, whether executed or unexecuted, and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected. He or she may also mitigate reduction in grade to forfeiture or detention of pay. When mitigating: (1) arrest in quarters to restriction; (2) correctional custody to extra duties or restriction or both; or (3) extra duties to restriction; the mitigated punishment shall not be for a greater period than the punishment mitigated. When mitigating forfeiture of pay to detention of pay, the amount of the detention shall not be greater than the amount of the forfeiture. When mitigating reduction in grade to forfeiture or detention of pay, the amount of the forfeiture or detention shall not be greater than the amount that could have been imposed initially under this chapter by the officer who imposed the punishment mitigated.

A person punished under this chapter who considers his or her punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority. The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided, but the person punished may in the meantime be required to undergo the punishment adjudged. The superior authority may exercise the same powers with respect to the punishment imposed as may be exercised under subsection (d) of this section by the officer who imposed the punishment. Before acting on an appeal from a punishment of:

Arrest in quarters for more than seven (7) days;

Correctional custody for more than seven (7) days;

Forfeiture of more than seven (7) days’ pay;

Reduction of one or more pay grades from the fourth or a higher pay grade;

Extra duties for more than fourteen (14) days;

Restriction for more than fourteen (14) days; or

Detention of more than fourteen (14) days’ pay;

the authority who is to act on the appeal shall refer the case to the staff judge advocate of the command, or in a command to which no staff judge advocate is assigned, then to the state judge advocate, for consideration and advice, and may so refer the case upon appeal from any punishment imposed under subsection (b) of this section.

The imposition and enforcement of disciplinary punishment under this chapter for any act or omission is not a bar to trial by court-martial for a serious crime or offense growing out of the same act or omission, and not properly punishable under this chapter; but the fact that a disciplinary punishment has been enforced may be shown by the accused upon trial, and when so shown shall be considered in determining the measure of the punishment to be adjudged in the event of a finding of guilty.

The adjutant general may, by regulation, prescribe the form of records to be kept of proceedings under this chapter and may also prescribe that certain categories of those proceedings shall be in writing.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-15

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 78, § 1.

30-13-16.
Courts-martial — Composition.

In the state military forces not in federal service, there are general, special, and summary courts-martial constituted like similar courts of the armed forces of the United States. They have the jurisdiction and powers, except as to punishments, and shall follow the forms and procedures provided for those courts.

The three (3) kinds of courts-martial are:

General courts-martial, consisting of a law officer and not less than five (5) members;

Special courts-martial, consisting of not less than three (3) members; and

Summary courts-martial, consisting of one commissioned officer of a rank not less than major.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-17.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial — In general.

Each force of the state military forces has court-martial jurisdiction over all persons subject to this code. The exercise of jurisdiction by one force over the personnel of another force shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-18.
Jurisdiction of general courts-martial.

Subject to §

30-13-17

, general courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code and may, under such limitations as the governor may prescribe, adjudge any of the following punishments:

Confinement with hard labor for not more than two hundred (200) days;

A fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200);

Forfeiture of pay and allowances of not more than two hundred dollars ($200);

Dismissal, bad conduct discharge, or dishonorable discharge;

A reprimand;

Reduction of enlisted persons to a lower grade; or

Any combination of these punishments.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-18

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-19.
Jurisdiction of special courts-martial.

Subject to §

30-13-17

, special courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code and may, under such limitations as the governor may prescribe, adjudge any of the following punishments:

Confinement with hard labor for not more than one hundred (100) days;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100);

Forfeiture of pay and allowances of not more than one hundred dollars ($100);

A reprimand;

Reduction of enlisted persons to a lower grade; or

Any combination of these punishments.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-19

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-20.
Jurisdiction of summary courts-martial.

Subject to §

30-13-17

, summary courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code, except officers, for any offense made punishable by this code.

No person with respect to whom summary courts-martial have jurisdiction may be brought to trial before a summary court-martial if that person objects thereto, unless under §

30-13-15

he or she has been permitted and has elected to refuse punishment under that section. If objection to trial by summary court-martial is made by an accused who has not been permitted to refuse punishment under §

30-13-15

, trial shall be ordered by special or general court-martial, as may be appropriate.

A summary court-martial may, under such limitations as the governor may prescribe, adjudge any of the following punishments:

Confinement with hard labor for not more than twenty-five (25) days;

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Forfeiture of pay and allowances of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

A reprimand;

Reduction of enlisted persons to a lower grade; or

Any combination of these punishments.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-21.
Sentences to be approved by governor.

No sentence of dismissal, bad conduct discharge, or dishonorable discharge may be executed until it is approved by the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-21

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-22.
Record of proceedings if dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or dismissal adjudged.

A dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or dismissal may not be adjudged by any court-martial unless a complete record of the proceedings and testimony before the court has been made.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-22

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-23.
Confinement in default of payment of fine.

All courts-martial shall have power to sentence, in the alternative, to confinement in default of payment of a fine imposed by the court. In these cases, the court shall fix a reasonable time within which the fine shall be paid; provided, however, that the sentence of confinement shall not exceed one day for each five dollars ($5.00) of fine imposed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-23

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-24.
Who may convene general courts-martial.

In the state military forces, general courts-martial may be convened by the governor or the adjutant general.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-24

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-25.
Who may convene special courts-martial.

In the state military forces, the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or other place where troops are on duty, or of a brigade, regiment, wing, group, detached battalion, separate squadron, or other detached command if not lower than a battalion or squadron level, may convene special courts-martial. Special courts-martial may also be convened by superior authority. When any commanding officer is an accuser, the court shall be convened by superior competent authority.

A special court-martial may not try a commissioned officer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-25

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-26.
Who may convene summary courts-martial.

In the state military forces not in federal service, the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or other place where troops are on duty, or of a regiment, wing, group, detached battalion, detached squadron, or other detachment of not less than battalion or squadron level, may convene a summary court-martial consisting of one commissioned officer of a rank not less than major. The proceedings shall be informal.

When only one commissioned officer is present with a command or detachment, that officer shall be the summary court-martial of that command or detachment and shall hear and determine all summary court-martial cases brought before him or her. Summary courts-martial may, however, be convened in any case by superior competent authority when considered desirable by him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-26

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-27.
Who may serve on courts-martial.

Any commissioned officer of or on duty with the state military forces is eligible to serve on all courts-martial for the trial of any person who may lawfully be brought before these courts for trial.

Any warrant officer of, or on duty with, the state military forces is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any person, other than a commissioned officer, who may lawfully be brought before these courts for trial.

Any enlisted member of the state military forces who is not a member of the same unit as the accused is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any enlisted member who may lawfully be brought before these courts for trial, but the enlisted member shall serve as a member of a court only if, before the convening of the court, the accused personally has requested, in writing, that enlisted members serve on it. After that request, the accused may not be tried by a general or special court-martial the membership of which does not include enlisted members in a number comprising at least one-third (1/3) of the total membership of the court, unless eligible members cannot be obtained on account of physical conditions or military exigencies. If these members cannot be obtained, the court may be convened and the trial held without them, but the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement, to be appended to the record, stating why they could not be obtained.

In this subsection, the word “unit” means any regularly organized body of the state military forces not larger than a company, a squadron, or a division of the naval militia, or a body corresponding to one of them.

When it can be avoided, no person subject to this code may be tried by a court-martial any member of which is junior to that person in rank or grade.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail as members thereof such members as, in his or her opinion, are best qualified for duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service, and judicial temperament. No member is eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial when he or she is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case. If within the command of the convening authority there is present and not otherwise disqualified a commissioned officer who is a member of the bar of the supreme court of the state and of appropriate rank and grade, the convening authority shall appoint that officer as president of a special court-martial. Although this requirement is binding on the convening authority, failure to meet it in any case does not divest a military court of jurisdiction.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-27

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-28.
Law officer of a general court-martial.

The authority convening a general court-martial shall detail as the law officer thereof a commissioned officer who is a member of the bar of the supreme court of the state, or a member of the bar of a federal court, and who is certified to be qualified for that duty by the state judge advocate. No person is eligible to act as law officer in a case if that person is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

The law officer may not consult with the members of the court, other than on the form of the findings as provided in §

30-13-42

, except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel, nor may the law officer vote with the members of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-28

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-29.
Detail of trial counsel and defense counsel.

For each general and special court-martial, the authority convening the court shall detail trial counsel and defense counsel, and such assistants as he or she considers appropriate. No person who has acted as investigating officer, law officer, or court member in any case may act later as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, defense counsel or assistant defense counsel in the same case. No person who has acted for the prosecution may act later in the same case for the defense, nor may any person who has acted for the defense act later in the same case for the prosecution.

Trial counsel or defense counsel detailed for a general court-martial:

Must be a person who is a member of the bar of the supreme court of the state, or a member of the bar of a federal court; and

Must be certified as competent to perform these duties by the state judge advocate.

In the case of a special court-martial, if the trial counsel is qualified to act as counsel before a general court-martial, or is a member of the bar of the supreme court of the state, the defense counsel detailed by the convening authority must be a person similarly qualified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-29

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-30.
Reporters and interpreters.

Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, the convening authority of a general or special court-martial or court of inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court. Under like regulations, the convening authority of a military court may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-30

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-31.
Absent and additional court-martial members.

No member of a general or special court-martial may be absent or excused after the accused has been arraigned except for physical disability or as the result of a challenge or by order of the convening authority for good cause.

Whenever a general court-martial is reduced below five (5) members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than five (5) members. When the new members have been sworn, the trial may proceed as if no evidence had previously been introduced.

Whenever a special court-martial is reduced below three (3) members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than three (3) members. When the new members have been sworn, the trial shall proceed as if no evidence had previously been introduced.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-31

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-32.
Charges and specifications.

Charges and specifications shall be signed by a person subject to this code, under oath before a person authorized by this code to administer oaths, and shall state:

That the signer has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the matters set forth therein; and

That they are true in fact to the best of the signer’s knowledge and belief.

Upon the preferring of charges, the proper authority shall take immediate steps to determine what disposition should be made thereof in the interest of justice and discipline, and the person accused shall be informed of the charges against him or her as soon as practicable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-33.
Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to incriminate himself or herself or to answer any question the answer to which may tend to incriminate him or her.

No person subject to this code may interrogate, or request any statement from, an accused or a person suspected of an offense without first informing that person of the nature of the accusation and advising that person that he or she does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which he or she is accused or suspected and that any statement made by that person may be used as evidence against him or her in a trial by court-martial.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military tribunal if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend to degrade him or her.

No statement obtained from any person in violation of this section, or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement may be received in evidence against him or her in a trial by court-martial.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-33

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.